Utah statutes.
58-17b-506.   Petitioning for reinstatement of licensure.

Any person whose license to practice pharmacy in this state has been revoked, suspended, or surrendered voluntarily or by action of the division, shall have the right at reasonable intervals, to petition the division for reinstatement of such license.  Such petition shall be made in writing and in the form prescribed by the division.  Upon investigation and hearing, the division may, in its discretion, grant or deny such petition, or it may modify its original finding to reflect any circumstances that have changed sufficiently to warrant such modifications.  The division, also at its discretion, may require such person to pass an examination or examinations for re-entry into the practice of pharmacy.



Enacted by Chapter 280, 2004 General Session

